New Jersey, session 222, S1589.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The department shall not charge a walk-in or bicycle admission fee for entrance into a State park or forest to any person on Memorial Day weekend, the week of the Fourth of July, or Labor Day weekend. 2. This act shall take effect one year after the date of enactment.